Maryland, session 2025, HB0783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
20–1301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Cultural and linguistic competency” means cultural and linguistic abilities
that can be incorporated into therapeutic and medical evaluation and treatment, including:
(1) Direct communication in the patient’s primary language;
(2) Understanding and applying the roles that culture, ethnicity, and race
play in diagnosis, treatment, and clinical care; and
– 1 –

Ch. 478 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Awareness of how the attitudes, values, and beliefs of health care
providers and patients influence and impact professional and patient relations.
(c) “Health care professional” includes a physician, nurse, dentist, social worker,
psychologist, pharmacist, health educator, or other allied health professional.
(d) “Implicit bias” means a bias in judgment that results from subtle cognitive
processes, including the following prejudices and stereotypes that often operate at a level
below conscious awareness and without intentional control:
(1) Prejudicial negative feelings or beliefs about a group that an individual
holds without being aware of the feelings or beliefs; and
(2) Unconscious attributions of particular qualities to a member of a
specific social group that are influenced by experience and based on learned associations
between various qualities and social categories, including race and gender.
(e) “Program” means the Cultural and Linguistic Health Care Professional
Competency Program.
(F) “STRUCTURAL RACISM” MEANS A SYSTEM OF INHERITED
INSTITUTIONAL SETTINGS THAT PROVIDE DIFFERENTIAL OPPORTUNITIES FOR
HEALTH CARE, EDUCATION, HOUSING, EMPLOYMENT, AND THE ENVIRONMENT TO
AN INDIVIDUAL BASED ON THE INDIVIDUAL’S RACE THE TOTALITY OF WAYS IN
WHICH SOCIETIES FOSTER RACIAL DISCRIMINATION BY MUTUALLY REINFORCING
SYSTEMS OF HOUSING, EDUCATION, EMPLOYMENT, EARNINGS, BENEFITS, CREDIT,
MEDIA, HEALTH CARE, AND CRIMINAL JUSTICE.
20–1302.
(a) There is a Cultural and Linguistic Health Care Professional Competency
Program.
(b) The purpose of the Program is to:
(1) Provide for a voluntary program in which educational classes are
offered to health care professionals to teach health care professionals:
(i) Methods to improve the health care professionals’ cultural and
linguistic competency to communicate with non–English speaking patients and patients
from other cultures who are English speaking;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 478
(ii) Cultural beliefs and practices that may impact patient health
care practices and allow health care professionals to incorporate the knowledge of the
beliefs and practices in the diagnosis and treatment of patients; and
(iii) Methods to enable health care professionals to increase the
health literacy of their patients to improve the patient’s ability to obtain, process, and
understand basic health information and services to make appropriate health care
decisions;
(2) Establish and provide an evidence–based implicit bias training
program for health care professionals involved in the perinatal care of patients under §
20–1305 of this subtitle; and
(3) Identify and approve implicit bias AND STRUCTURAL RACISM training
programs for health occupation licensure and certification under § 1–225 of the Health
Occupations Article.
20–1306.
(a) (1) The Program shall, in coordination with the Office of Minority Health
and Health Disparities, identify and approve implicit bias AND STRUCTURAL RACISM
training programs that an individual may complete to satisfy the requirements of § 1–225
of the Health Occupations Article.
(2) The Program may approve only implicit bias AND STRUCTURAL
RACISM training programs under paragraph (1) of this subsection that are recognized by a
health occupations board established under the Health Occupations Article or accredited
by the Accreditation Council for Continuing Medical Education OR THE ACCREDITATION
COUNCIL FOR PHARMACY EDUCATION.
(b) The Program shall provide a list of training programs approved under
subsection (a) of this section on request.
Article – Health Occupations
1–225.
(a) [An] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) (C) OF THIS SECTION, AN applicant for
the renewal of a license or certificate issued by a health occupations board under this article
shall attest in the application that the applicant has completed an implicit bias AND
STRUCTURAL RACISM training program approved by the Cultural and Linguistic Health
Care Professional Competency Program under § 20–1306 of the Health – General Article.
(b) EACH HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT
ALLOW AN APPLICANT SEEKING LICENSE RENEWAL TO RECEIVE CONTINUING
– 3 –

Ch. 478 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
EDUCATION CREDITS FOR COMPLETING AN IMPLICIT BIAS AND STRUCTURAL
RACISM TRAINING PROGRAM.
(C) The [requirements of] REQUIREMENT UNDER subsection (a) of this section
THAT AN APPLICANT ATTEST TO THE COMPLETION OF AN IMPLICIT BIAS AND
STRUCTURAL RACISM TRAINING PROGRAM shall apply only to an applicant’s first
license or certificate renewal after April 1, [2022] 2026.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if an applicant for the
renewal of a license or certificate issued by a health occupations board under the Health
Occupations Article is applying on or after the effective date of this Act but before April 1,
2026, for the applicant’s first license or certificate renewal, the applicant shall attest in the
application that the applicant has completed an implicit bias training program approved
by the Cultural and Linguistic Health Care Professional Competency Program under §
20–1306 of the Health – General Article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that the structural racism training required under this Act be developed and
offered using funding from the grant provided to the Maryland Nurses Association from the
American Nurses Association to advance antiracism efforts.
SECTION 3. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 4 –